Arkansas, session 2025, HB1740.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 2, Chapter 33, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
2-33-117. Exemption from disclosure.
The following items received by or in the custody of the Department of
Agriculture are not public records and are exempt from examination or
disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.:
(1) A certificate of veterinary inspection as defined in § 2-40-
801; and
(2) Personal information obtained from or associated with any
animal electronic identification tag.




*CRH237*
03/11/2025 10:02:36 AM CRH237